Missouri, session 2026, SB1182.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 304.184, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 304.184,
to read as follows:
304.184. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, any truck, tractor-trailer or other
combination engaged in transporting solid waste, as defined
by section 260.200, between any city and a solid waste
disposal area or solid waste processing facility approved by
the department of natural resources or department of health
and senior services, may operate with a weight not to exceed
twenty-two thousand four hundred pounds on one axle or a
weight not to exceed forty-four thousand eight hundred
pounds on any tandem axle; but nothing in this section shall
be construed to permit the operation of any motor vehicle on
the interstate highway system in excess of the weight limits
imposed by federal statute; and no such truck, tractor-
trailer or other combination shall exceed the width and
length limitations provided in section 304.190.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, the Missouri department of transportation shall
allow any truck, tractor-trailer, or other combination
engaged in transporting material or equipment to a
construction site where economic activity occurs or will
occur to operate with a weight not to exceed twenty-two
1

thousand four hundred pounds on one axle or a weight not to
exceed forty-four thousand eight hundred pounds on any
tandem axle; but nothing in this subsection shall be
construed to permit the operation of any motor vehicle on
the interstate highway system in excess of the weight limits
imposed by federal statute; and no such truck, tractor-
trailer, or other combination shall exceed the width and
length limitations provided in section 304.190.
3. Any such truck, tractor-trailer, train, or any
other combination shall not make a one-way trip longer than
sixteen miles or a round trip longer than thirty-two miles.
4. Any such trip shall be multimodal within a single
county.
5. Any exemption in this section shall be granted by
the Missouri department of transportation if the truck,
tractor-trailer, train, or other combination engaged in
transport qualify. These exemptions shall be available
regardless of reducibility of the weight of the load carried.
2